test/src/morphology/N-kogwr36_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - "kogõr, kokr": # Noun (36) "kogõr, kokr" 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kogõr+N+Sg+Nom: [kogõr, kokr]
     kogõr+N+Sg+Gen: kogrõ
     kogõr+N+Sg+Par: kokrõ
     kogõr+N+Sg+Ill: kokrõ
     kogõr+N+Pl+Gen: kokri
     kogõr+N+Pl+Par: kokri
     kogõr+N+Pl+Ill: [kokrihe, kokri]
     kogõr+N+Pl+All: kogrilõ
